Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1270
Violations; general penalty.

Any person who violates any provisions of the State Boat Act, or any provisions of the rules and regulations established by the commission pursuant thereto, for which a penalty is not otherwise provided, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for each such violation.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 70;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 124.